Florida, session 2026, HB4025.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The Board of Trustees of the Internal
Improvement Trust Fund shall convey to the Village Council of
the Village of Tequesta, in fee simple, and for all uses as
permitted by law, the following described 41.1 acres more or
less of real property, together with the improvements thereon,
located in Martin County and more particularly described as
follows:

Beginning at a point on Range Line 43 East marking the
West boundary line of Section 19, Township 40 South,
Range 43 East, Martin County, where said line
intersects an imaginary line 50 feet North of and
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4025 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4025 2026 Legislature
parallel to the centerline of the County Road marking
the boundary line of Martin and Palm Beach Counties,
this as a point of beginning; thence, East along a
line paralleling the County Road centerline as
aforesaid, a distance of 848.25 feet; thence, North
along a line parallel to the aforesaid Range Line, a
distance of 1320 feet; thence, West along a line
parallel to the aforedescribed West-to-East Line, a
distance of 848.25 feet to the aforesaid Range line.
All of the aforedescribed parcel being located in
Section 19; thence, continuing West, a distance of 826
feet more or less to the Easterly right-of-way line of
Old Dixie Highway, lying East of and running parallel
to the Florida East Coast Railway; thence,
Southeasterly along the Easterly right-of-way line of
Old Dixie Highway to a point where said right-of-way
line intersects a Westerly extension of the first
described imaginary line parallel to the County Road;
thence, East along said extended line a distance of
191.75 feet more or less, to the point of beginning.
All of the last described parcel being located in
Section 24, Township 40 South, Range 42 East, Martin
County.

Section 2. The Village Council of the Village of Tequesta
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4025 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4025 2026 Legislature
shall manage and protect the real property described in section
1, together with the improvements thereon, and use the real
property, together with the improvements thereon, continuously
as a public park and greenspace for resource-based outdoor
public recreation activities, resource-based education
activities, conservation activities, and the protection of
natural and historical resources located thereon.
Section 3. The Village of Tequesta shall retain ownership
of the real property described in section 1, together with the
improvements thereon, including all improvements funded in whole
or in part by the Village of Tequesta, in perpetuity. Any sale
or disposition of the real property described in section 1,
together with the improvements thereon, by the Village Council
of the Village of Tequesta shall result in ownership of the real
property, together with all improvements thereon, including all
improvements funded in whole or in part by the Village of
Tequesta, reverting to the Board of Trustees of the Internal
Improvement Trust Fund on behalf of the state.
Section 4. The Board of Trustees of the Internal
Improvement Trust Fund shall convey the real property described
in section 1, together with the improvements thereon, to the
Village Council of the Village of Tequesta within 60 days after
the effective date of this act.
Section 5. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law
or on June 1, 2026, whichever occurs earlier.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4025 -00-er